Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 8. Adjudication.
§ 16.1-277.01.
Approval of entrustment agreement.

In any case in which a child has been entrusted pursuant to §

63.2-903

or

63.2-1817

to the local board of social services or to a child welfare agency, a petition for approval of the entrustment agreement by the board or agency:

Shall be filed within a reasonable period of time, no later than 89 days after the execution of an entrustment agreement for less than 90 days, if the child is not returned to the caretaker from whom he was entrusted within that period;

Shall be filed within a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 30 days after the execution of an entrustment agreement for 90 days or longer or for an unspecified period of time, if such entrustment agreement does not provide for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child; and

May be filed in the case of a permanent entrustment agreement which provides for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child.The board or agency shall file a foster care plan pursuant to §

16.1-281

to be heard with any petition for approval of an entrustment agreement.

Upon the filing of a petition for approval of an entrustment agreement pursuant to subsection A of §

16.1-241

, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the child in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-266

, and shall schedule the matter for a hearing to be held as follows: within 45 days of the filing of a petition pursuant to subdivision A 1, A 2 or A 3, except where an order of publication has been ordered by the court, in which case the hearing shall be held within 75 days of the filing of the petition. The court shall provide notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to the following, each of whom shall be a party entitled to participate in the proceeding:

The local board of social services or child welfare agency;

The child, if he is 12 years of age or older;

The guardian ad litem for the child; and

The child’s parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis to the child. No such notification shall be required, however, if the judge certifies on the record that the identity of the parent or guardian is not reasonably ascertainable. A birth father shall be given notice of the proceedings if he is an acknowledged father pursuant to §

20-49.1

, adjudicated pursuant to §

20-49.8

, or presumed pursuant to §

63.2-1202

, or has registered with the Virginia Birth Father Registry pursuant to Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.). An affidavit of the mother that the identity of the father is not reasonably ascertainable shall be sufficient evidence of this fact, provided there is no other evidence before the court which would refute such an affidavit. Failure to register with the Virginia Birth Father Registry pursuant to Article 7 (§

63.2-1249

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2 shall be evidence that the identity of the father is not reasonably ascertainable. The hearing shall be held and an order may be entered, although a parent, guardian, legal custodian or person standing in loco parentis fails to appear and is not represented by counsel, provided personal or substituted service was made on the person, or the court determines that such person cannot be found, after reasonable effort, or in the case of a person who is without the Commonwealth, the person cannot be found or his post office address cannot be ascertained after reasonable effort. However, when a petition seeks approval of a permanent entrustment agreement which provides for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child, a summons shall be served upon the parent or parents and the other parties specified in §

16.1-263

. The summons or notice of hearing shall clearly state the consequences of a termination of residual parental rights. Service shall be made pursuant to §

16.1-264

. The remaining parent’s parental rights may be terminated even though that parent has not entered into an entrustment agreement if the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interest of the child and that (i) the identity of the parent is not reasonably ascertainable; (ii) the identity and whereabouts of the parent are known or reasonably ascertainable, and the parent is personally served with notice of the termination proceeding pursuant to §

8.01-296

or

8.01-320

; (iii) the whereabouts of the parent are not reasonably ascertainable and the parent is given notice of the termination proceedings by certified or registered mail to the last known address and such parent fails to object to the proceedings within 15 days of the mailing of such notice; or (iv) the whereabouts of the parent are not reasonably ascertainable and the parent is given notice of the termination proceedings through an order of publication pursuant to §§

8.01-316

and

8.01-317

, and such parent fails to object to the proceedings.

At the hearing held pursuant to this section, the court shall hear evidence on the petition filed and shall review the foster care plan for the child filed by the local board or child welfare agency in accordance with §

16.1-281

.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall make a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, whether approval of the entrustment agreement is in the best interest of the child. However, if the petition seeks approval of a permanent entrustment agreement which provides for the termination of all parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child, the court shall make a finding, based upon clear and convincing evidence, whether termination of parental rights is in the best interest of the child. If the court makes either of these findings, the court may make any of the orders of disposition permitted in a case involving an abused or neglected child pursuant to §

16.1-278.2

. Any such order transferring legal custody of the child shall be made in accordance with the provisions of subdivision A 5 of §

16.1-278.2

and shall be subject to the provisions of subsection D1. This order shall include, but need not be limited to, the following findings: (i) that there is no less drastic alternative to granting the requested relief; and (ii) that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal and that continued placement in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, if the order transfers legal custody of the child to a local board of social services. At any time subsequent to the transfer of legal custody of the child pursuant to this section, a birth parent or parents of the child and the pre-adoptive parent or parents may enter into a written post-adoption contact and communication agreement in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-283.1

and Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2. The court shall not require a written post-adoption contact and communication agreement as a precondition to entry of an order in any case involving the child.The effect of the court’s order approving a permanent entrustment agreement is to terminate an entrusting parent’s residual parental rights. Any order terminating parental rights shall be accompanied by an order (i) continuing or granting custody to a local board of social services or to a licensed child-placing agency or (ii) granting custody or guardianship to a person with a legitimate interest. Such an order continuing or granting custody to a local board of social services or to a licensed child-placing agency shall indicate whether that board or agency shall have the authority to place the child for adoption and consent thereto. A final order terminating parental rights pursuant to this section renders the approved entrustment agreement irrevocable. Such order may be appealed in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-296

.

The local board or licensed child-placing agency to which authority is given to place the child for adoption and consent thereto after an order terminating parental rights is entered pursuant to this section shall file a written Adoption Progress Report with the juvenile court on the progress being made to place the child in an adoptive home. The report shall be filed with the court every six months from the date of the final order terminating parental rights until a final order of adoption is entered on behalf of the child in the circuit court. At the conclusion of the hearing at which termination of parental rights is ordered and authority is given to the local board or licensed child-placing agency to place the child for adoption, the juvenile court shall schedule a date by which the board or agency shall file the first Adoption Progress Report required by this section. A copy of the Adoption Progress Report shall be sent by the court to the guardian ad litem for the child. The court may schedule a hearing on the report with or without the request of a party.

D1.

Any order transferring custody of the child to a person with a legitimate interest pursuant to subsection D shall be entered only upon a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that such person is one who (i) after an investigation as directed by the court, is found by the court to be willing and qualified to receive and care for the child; (ii) is willing to have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; (iii) is committed to providing a permanent, suitable home for the child; and (iv) is willing and has the ability to protect the child from abuse and neglect; and the order shall so state. The court’s order transferring custody to a person with a legitimate interest should further provide for, as appropriate, any terms and conditions which would promote the child’s interest and welfare; ongoing provision of social services to the child and the child’s custodian; and court review of the child’s placement.

History.

1999, c. 889; 2000, c. 385; 2006, c. 825; 2009, cc. 98, 260; 2010, c. 331; 2017, c. 200; 2019, c. 434.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 825, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act that establish the Putative Father Registry shall not become effective unless an appropriation of general funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act passed by the 2006 Session of the General Assembly, which becomes law.” The funding was provided in the 2006 appropriation act. See Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385, in the introductory paragraph of subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “to be held as follows,” substituted “a” for “the” preceding the second occurrence of “petition,” and added “pursuant to subdivision A 1, A 2 or A 3 of this section, except where an order of publication has been ordered by the court, in which case the hearing shall be held within seventy-five days of the filing of the petition” to the end; added “and shall be subject to the provisions of subsection D1 of this section” to the end of the fourth sentence of the first paragraph of subsection D; and added subsection D1.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 825, effective July 1, 2007, in subsection B, in the last paragraph, inserted the second and fourth sentences and substituted “15 days” for “twenty-one days” in clause (iii) of the last sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 98 and 260 are identical, and added the last two sentences in the first paragraph of subsection D.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 331 substituted “§

16.1-283.1

and Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2” for “§§

16.1-283.1

and

63.2-1228.1

” in the first paragraph of subsection D and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 200 substituted “Virginia Birth Father Registry” for “Putative Father Registry” twice in subdivision B 4.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 434, in the second paragraph of subsection D, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual”; in subsection D1, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual” twice, and substituted “such person” for “the relative or other interested individual.”

§ 16.1-277.02.
Petition for relief of care and custody.

Requests for petitions for relief of the care and custody of a child shall be referred initially to the local department of social services for investigation and the provision of services, if appropriate, in accordance with the provisions of §

63.2-319

or Chapter 15 (§

63.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 63.2. Upon the filing of a petition for relief of a child’s care and custody pursuant to subdivision A 4 of §

16.1-241

, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the child in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-266

, and shall schedule the matter for a hearing on the petition. Such hearing on the petition may include partial or final disposition of the matter. The court shall provide notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to the following, each of whom shall be a party entitled to participate in the proceeding:

The child, if he is 12 years of age or older;

The guardian ad litem for the child;

The child’s parents, custodian or other person standing in loco parentis to the child. No such notification shall be required, however, if the judge certifies on the record that the identity of the parent is not reasonably ascertainable. An affidavit of the mother that the identity of the father is not reasonably ascertainable shall be sufficient evidence of this fact, provided there is no other evidence before the court which would refute such an affidavit. The hearing on the petition shall be held pursuant to this section although a parent fails to appear and is not represented by counsel, provided personal or substituted service was made on the parent, or the court determines that such person cannot be found, after reasonable effort, or in the case of a person who is without the Commonwealth, the person cannot be found or his post office address cannot be ascertained after reasonable effort. However, in the case of a hearing to grant a petition for permanent relief of custody and terminate a parent’s residual parental rights, notice to the parent whose rights may be affected shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of §§

16.1-263

and

16.1-264

; and

The local board of social services. Upon receiving notice of the hearing pursuant to this section, the local board of social services shall investigate the matter and provide services, as appropriate, in accordance with the provisions of §

63.2-319

or Chapter 15 (§

63.2-1500

et seq.) of Title 63.2.

At the hearing, the local board of social services, the child, the child’s parents, guardian, legal custodian or other person standing in loco parentis and any other family or household member of the child to whom notice was given shall have the right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses and evidence and to present evidence on their own behalf.

At the conclusion of the hearing on the petition, the court shall make a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, whether there is good cause shown for the petitioner’s desire to be relieved of the child’s care and custody, unless the petition seeks permanent relief of custody and termination of parental rights. If the petition seeks permanent relief of custody and termination of parental rights, the court shall make a finding, based upon clear and convincing evidence, whether termination of parental rights is in the best interest of the child. If the court makes either of these findings, the court may enter:

A preliminary protective order pursuant to §

16.1-253

;

An order that requires the local board of social services to provide services to the family as required by law;

An order that is consistent with any of the dispositional alternatives pursuant to §

16.1-278.3

; or

Any combination of these orders.Any such order transferring legal custody of the child shall be made in accordance with the provisions of subdivision A 5 of §

16.1-278.2

and shall be subject to the provisions of subsection C1. This order shall include, but need not be limited to, the following findings: (i) that there is no less drastic alternative to granting the requested relief; and (ii) that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent removal and that continued placement in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child, if the order transfers legal custody of the child to a local board of social services. Any order terminating residual parental rights shall be accompanied by an order continuing or granting custody to a local board of social services or to a licensed child-placing agency or granting custody or guardianship to a person with a legitimate interest. Such an order continuing or granting custody to a local board of social services or to a licensed child-placing agency shall indicate whether that board or agency shall have the authority to place the child for adoption and consent thereto. At any time subsequent to the transfer of legal custody of the child pursuant to this section, a birth parent or parents of the child and the pre-adoptive parent or parents may enter into a written post-adoption contact and communication agreement in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-283.1

and Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2. The court shall not require a written post-adoption contact and communication agreement as a precondition to entry of an order in any case involving the child.The court shall schedule a subsequent hearing within 60 days of the hearing held pursuant to this section: (a) to enter a final order of disposition pursuant to §

16.1-278.3

or (b) if the child is placed in foster care, for review of the foster care plan filed pursuant to §

16.1-281

. If a party is required to be present at the subsequent hearing, and (1) is present at the hearing on the petition, the party shall be given notice of the date set for the subsequent hearing; (2) if not present, shall be summoned as provided in §

16.1-263

.

The local board or licensed child-placing agency to which authority is given to place the child for adoption and consent thereto after an order terminating parental rights is entered pursuant to this section shall file a written Adoption Progress Report with the juvenile court on the progress being made to place the child in an adoptive home. The report shall be filed with the court every six months from the date of the final order terminating parental rights until a final order of adoption is entered on behalf of the child in the circuit court. At the conclusion of the hearing at which termination of parental rights is ordered and authority is given to the local board or licensed child-placing agency to place the child for adoption, the juvenile court shall schedule a date by which the board or agency shall file the first Adoption Progress Report required by this section. A copy of the Adoption Progress Report shall be sent by the court to the guardian ad litem for the child. The court may schedule a hearing on the report with or without the request of a party.

C1.

Any order transferring temporary custody of the child to a person with a legitimate interest pursuant to subsection C shall be entered only upon a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that such person is one who (i) is found by the court to be willing and qualified to receive and care for the child; (ii) is willing to have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; and (iii) is willing and has the ability to protect the child from abuse and neglect. The court’s order transferring temporary custody to a person with a legitimate interest should further provide for compliance with any preliminary protective order entered on behalf of the child in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-253

; and, as appropriate, ongoing provision of social services to the child and the child’s custodian; and court review of the child’s placement with such person with a legitimate interest. Any final order transferring custody of the child to a person with a legitimate interest pursuant to this section shall, in addition, be entered only after an investigation as directed by the court and upon a finding, stated in the court’s order, that such person is one who satisfies clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) and is committed to providing a permanent, suitable home for the child.

History.

1999, c. 889; 2000, c. 385; 2009, cc. 98, 260; 2010, c. 331; 2013, c. 130; 2019, c. 434.

Cross references.

As to foster care plans, permissible plan goals, and court review of foster children, see §

63.2-906

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385 added “and shall be subject to the provisions of subsection C1 of this section” to the end of the first sentence of the next-to-last paragraph of subsection C; and added subsection C1.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 98 and 260 are identical, and added the last two sentences in the next-to-last paragraph of subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 331 substituted “§

16.1-283.1

and Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2” for “§§

16.1-283.1

and

63.2-1228.1

” in the next-to-last sentence of the second full paragraph of subsection C and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 130, effective July 1, 2014, in the last paragraph of subsection C, subsituted “60 days” for “75 days” and changed the clause (i) and (ii) designators to (a) and (b) in the first sentence, and changed the clause (i) and (ii) designators to (1) and (2) in the second sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 434, in the second paragraph of subsection C, substituted “services or to a licensed child-placing agency or granting custody or guardianship to a person with a legitimate interest” for “services, to a licensed child-placing agency or the granting of custody or guardianship to a relative or other interested individual”; in subsection C1, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual” three times, substituted “such person” for “the relative or other interested individual” twice, and substituted “such person with a legitimate interest” for “the relative or other individual.”

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘In the Little World’: Breaking Virginia’s Foster-Care-to-Prison Pipeline Using Restorative Justice,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 313 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 11.

§ 16.1-277.1.
Time limitation.

When a child is held continuously in secure detention, he shall be released from confinement if there is no adjudicatory or transfer hearing conducted by the court for the matters upon which he was detained within twenty-one days from the date he was first detained.

If a child is not held in secure detention or is released from same after having been confined, an adjudicatory or transfer hearing on the matters charged in the petition or petitions issued against him shall be conducted within 120 days from the date the petition or petitions are filed.

When a child is held in secure detention after the completion of his adjudicatory hearing or is detained when the juvenile court has retained jurisdiction as a result of a transfer hearing, he shall be released from such detention if the disposition hearing is not completed within thirty days from the date of the adjudicatory or transfer hearing.

The time limitations provided for in this section shall be tolled during any period in which (i) the whereabouts of the child are unknown, (ii) the child has escaped from custody, (iii) the child has failed to appear pursuant to a court order, or (iv) a report is being prepared pursuant to the written request by the attorney for the Commonwealth in accordance with subsection C of §

16.1-269.1

. The limitations also may be extended by the court for a reasonable period of time based upon good cause shown, provided that the basis for such extension is recorded in writing and filed among the papers of the proceedings. For the purposes of this section, good cause includes extension of limitations necessary to obtain the presence of a witness to testify regarding the results of scientific analyses or examinations and good cause shown by the director of the court services unit completing a report pursuant to subsection C of §

16.1-269.1

that additional time is needed for the completion of the report.

History.

1985, c. 260; 1988, c. 220; 1999, c. 58; 2009, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 1, 4; 2020, cc. 987, 988.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1999 amendment

divided the former provisions of subsection D into two sentences by inserting “shall be tolled during any period in which (i) the whereabouts of the child are unknown, (ii) the child has escaped from custody, or (iii) the child has failed to appear pursuant to a court order. The limitations also.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, effective August 21, 2009, and Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, effective September 15, 2009, are identical, and added the last sentence of subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 987 and 988 are identical, and in subsection D in the first sentence, added “or (iv) a report is being prepared pursuant to the written request by the attorney for the Commonwealth in accordance with subsection C of §

16.1-269.1

” at the end, and, in the last sentence, deleted “but is not limited to” preceding “extension” and added “and good cause shown by the director of the court services unit completing a report pursuant to subsection C of §

16.1-269.1

that additional time is needed for the completion of the report” at the end, and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

For annual survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 339 (2009).

§ 16.1-277.2.
Rejection of plea agreement; recusal.

Upon rejecting a plea agreement in any delinquency matter, a judge shall immediately recuse himself from any further proceedings on the same matter unless the parties agree otherwise.

History.

2014, c. 165.